California, session 20252026, AB1505.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6029 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:6029. This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 14401 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:14401. A medically important antimicrobial drug shall not be administered to livestock unless it is ordered by a licensed veterinarian through a prescription or veterinary feed directive that complies with federal and state law, including, but not limited to, Part 514 (commencing with Section 514.1), Part 530 (commencing with Section 530.1), and Part 558 (commencing with Section 558.3) of Subchapter E of Chapter I of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations and Section 4826.6 of the Business and Professions Code. A prescription for labeled use of a medically important antimicrobial drug shall be issued pursuant to a veterinarian-client-patient relationship that meets the requirements of Section 4826.6 of the Business and Professions Code. Veterinary feed directives and prescriptions for extralabel use of a medically important antimicrobial drug shall be issued pursuant to a veterinarian-client-patient relationship that meets the requirements of Section 530.3 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.SEC. 3. Section 47007.5 is added to the Food and Agricultural Code, to read:47007.5. (a) An enforcing officer may enter and inspect any place or conveyance where products are produced, stored, packed, delivered for shipment, loaded, shipped, transported, or sold pertaining to a certified mobile farmers’ market over which they have jurisdiction.(b) An enforcing officer may inspect all documentation, products, containers, and equipment found in any place or conveyance to determine compliance with this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder. The enforcing officer may also take representative samples of products and containers, which may be subject to any method of inspection or testing as deemed necessary.(c) An enforcing officer may seize and hold as evidence all or any part of any container, pack, load, bulk lot, consignment, or shipment of products that is packed, delivered for shipment, loaded, shipped, transported, or sold to secure the conviction of the party the enforcing officer knows, or believes, has violated, or is violating, this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder.(d) Any evidence that is seized by an enforcing officer in any county under the authority of this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder, may be admitted into evidence in any action taken by any other county.(e) This chapter does not preclude the creation and keeping of additional information that a certified mobile farmers’ market operator may endeavor itself to create and keep, or contractually require a vendor to provide additional information as a condition to selling in an operator’s certified mobile farmers’ market.